Missouri, session 2026, HB3250.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 160, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 160.1100, to read as follows:
160.1100. 1. The school board of each school district shall establish a written
policy governing student participation in protest activities.
2. The policy shall provide, at a minimum, that:
(1) Students shall not be released from classes to participate in protest activities
without express parental permission;
(2) That parental permission shall specify the event for which the student is to be
released and the subject matter of the protest activity; and
(3) That parental permission shall be provided for each protest activity and
permission for one protest activity shall not constitute approval for any other protest
activity.
3. A school that violates the provisions of this section shall receive a reduction of
funds equivalent to the funds received per pupil for each instance and for each student
that is allowed to participate in protest activities without express parental permission.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3250 2
4. As used in this section the term "protest activities" shall include, but not be
limited to, events not sponsored by the school such as political assemblies and political
speeches occurring on or off school district property during school hours.
✔